tex/context/patterns/mkii/lang-sr.pat
.u3s4poren
.u3s4porenj
.u3s4poreč
.u3s4posob
.u3s4premi
.u3s4prema
.u3s4rk
.u3s4rn
.u3s4rp
.u3s4rlj
.u3s4rt
.u3s4rđ
.u3s4rž
.u3s4ra
.u3s4rd
.u3s4re
.u3s4rijed
.u2s3talas
.u2s3tara
.u2s3tvrđ
.u2s3tvrd
.u2s3ter
.u2s3teć
.u2s3teg
.u2s3tov
.u2s3traj
.u2s3tral
.u2s3trg
.u2s3trep
.u2s3tres
.u2s3treb
.u2s3trk
.u2s3trn
.u2s3trp
.u2s3trć
.u2s3trč
.u2s3tum
.u2s3tur
.u2s3tuć
.u2š3ć
.u2š3č
.a2b3alij
.a2b3anac
.a2b3evak
.a2b3erac
.a2b3erir
.a2b3irit
.a2b3ju
.a2b3la
.a2b3leg
.a2b3lep
.a2b3lok
.a2b3lu
.a2b3orig
.a2b3reak
.a2b3rog
.a2b3uzus
.a2d3erac
.a2d3verb
.a2d3j
.a2d3lat
.a2d3ren
.a2d3rog
.a3g2nos
.a3g2noz
.a2nabap
.a2nabaz
.a2nabat
.a2nabio
.a2nabol
.a2nagen
.a2nagno
.a2n3ago
.a2nagra
.a2nadem
.a2nadipl
.a2nadoz
.a2n3a4e2ro
.a2nakal
.a2nakam
.a2nakat
.a2nakef
.a2nakla
.a2nakli
.a2nakoj
.a2n3akuz
.a2n3alg
.a2n3ald
.a2nalep
.a2naliz
.a2nalis
.a2nalit
.a2n3amert
.a2namne
.a2n3andr
.a2naneo
.a2n3ant
.a2napla
.a2naple
.a2napne
.a2napno
.a2napro
.a2napti
.a2n3apto
.a2nart
.a2n3arh
.a2nasar
.a2nasei
.a2naspaz
.a2nasta
.a2nastig
.a2nastom
.a2natim
.a2natom
.a2natoc
.a2natre
.a2natri
.a2natro
.a2nafaz
.a2n3afij
.a2nafila
.a2nafon
.a2n3afrod
.a2nakol
.a2nakron
.a2nakru
.a2n3alfa
.a2nafor
.a2nahor
.a2nahro
.a2n3eger
.a2n3ekl
.a2n3ekum
.a2n3elek
.a2n3ener
.a2n3epi
.a2neor
.a2n3erg
.a2n3erit
.a2n3este
.a2n3idr
.a2n3izog
.a2n3izom
.a2n3izur
.a2n3irid
.a2n3ovar
.a2n3oks
.a2n3opis
.a2n3orh
.a2n3oft
.a2n3org
.di2s3akor
.di2s3junk
.di2s3kval
.di2s3kont
.di2s3kord
.di2s3kre
.di2s3kri
.di2s3kur
.di2s3lo
.di2s3orij
.di2s3parit
.di2s3poz
.di2s3pon
.di2s3prop
.di2s3ton
.di2s3trak
.i2n3abrup
.i2n3adek
.i2n3akur
.i2n3akce
.i2n3amor
.i2n3anic
.i2n3aplik
.i2n3apst
.i2n3art
.i2n3augur
.i2n3aura
.i2n3afek
.i2n3evid
.i2n3eg
.i2n3ed
.i2n3ekv
.i2n3eks
.i2n3elig
.i2n3epc
.i2n3efek
.i2n3obl
.i2nogen
.i2nokor
.i2n3okup
.i2n3oper
.i2n3opor
.i2n3opse
.i2n3ofic
.i2n3umbr
.i2n3unda
.i2n3unk
.i2n3util
.inte2r3i
.inte2r3o
.inte2r3u
.inte2r3a
.inte2r3e
.inte3r4egn
.inte3r4esi
.inte3r4esn
.inte3r4eso
.inte3r4esu
.inte3r4esa
.inte3r4ese
.inte3r4eždž
.inte3r4ije
.inte2r3je
.inte3r4ogat
.juri2s3k
.juri2s3p
.nu2z3bel
.nu2z3bilj
.nu2z3ljub
.nu2z3re
.nu2z3rje
.nu2z3už
.nu2s3pos
.nu2s3pro
.po2st3egz
.po2st3indu
.po2st3lim
.po2st3onk
.po2st3oper
.su2b3a
.su2b3l
.su3b4aš
.su2b3inv
.su2b3junk
.su2b3oks
.su2b3rep
.su2b3rog
.su2b3ord
.supe2r3i
.supe2r3o
.supe2r3u
.supe2r3a
.supe2r3e
.supe3r4ior
.tran2s3a
.tran2s3c
.tran2s3e
.tran2s3k
.tran2s3l
.tran2s3m
.tran2s3n
.tran2s3o
.tran2s3p
.tran2s3t
.tran2s3u
.tran2s3v
.tran2s3nj
.tran3s4ep
.tran3s4kri
.tran3s4um
.tran3s4ud
.a2n3jon
.i2n3jek
.i2n3jur
.i2n3just
.o2d3žal
.o2d3žalj
.o2d3ži
.o2d3žv
.o2d3že
.pre2d3ži
.pre2d3že
.na2d3ždr
.na2d3žnj
.na2d3že
.na2d3žanj
.na2d3žir
.na2d3živ
.na2d3žup
l2j
n2j
d2ž
2dž.}
